Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 8
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

26-8-101. Rehabilitation programs - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1208, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1188), ch. 58, p. 137, § 1, effective March 30; (2) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 14.

26-8-102. Personnel - terminology - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1208, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-2.

L. 2015:

(3) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 14.

26-8-103. Functions of the department - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1208, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-3.

L. 2015:

(2) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 14.

26-8-104. Administration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1208, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-4.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended, p. 1157, § 117, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1191, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 14.

26-8-105. Rehabilitation of persons with disabilities - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1209, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-5.

L. 93:

(1), IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(c), (3)(a), (3)(d), and (4) amended, p. 1665, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2), (3)(a), and (4) amended, (3)(h) repealed, and (5) added, (HB 15-1188), ch. 58, p. 137, § 2, effective March 30; (6) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 14.

26-8-106. Cooperation with federal government - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1210, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-9-6.

L. 2015:

(2) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 487, 490, §§ 3, 15.

26-8-107. Work therapy program - creation - cash fund.

There is hereby created in the state department a work therapy program to provide sheltered workshop programs for training and employment of persons receiving services at the mental health institutes and at the regional centers located at Grand Junction, Pueblo, and Wheat Ridge.

The state department shall transmit all moneys collected pursuant to this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the work therapy cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall consist of any moneys held for the state department as of May 3, 2012, from work therapy activities and any moneys received by the state department after May 3, 2012, pursuant to this paragraph (a). The moneys in the fund are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the direct and indirect costs associated with implementing this section.

The state treasurer may invest any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1342), ch. 156, p. 556, § 1, effective May 3.